California statutes. Education Code
(3) A witness shall not be permitted to testify at the hearing except upon oath or affirmation. No testimony shall be given or evidence introduced relating to matters that occurred more than four years before the date of the filing of the notice, except evidence of egregious misconduct, as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 44932, which shall not be excluded based on the passage of time.

(4) Evidence of records regularly kept by the governing board of the school district concerning the employee may be introduced, but no decision relating to the dismissal or suspension of an employee shall be made based on charges or evidence of any nature relating to matters occurring more than four years before the filing of the notice, except evidence of egregious
 misconduct, as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 44932, which shall not be excluded based on the passage of time.

(e) (1) The administrative law judge shall prepare a written decision containing findings of fact, determinations of issues, and a disposition that shall be, solely, one of the following:

(A) That the employee should be dismissed.

(B) That the employee should be suspended for a specific period of time without pay.

(C) That the employee should not be dismissed or suspended.

(2) The decision of the administrative law judge that the employee should not be dismissed or suspended shall not be based on nonsubstantive procedural errors
 committed by the school district or the governing board of the school district unless the errors are prejudicial errors.

(3) The administrative law judge shall not have the power to dispose of the charge of dismissal by imposing probation or other alternative sanctions. The imposition of suspension pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) shall be available only in a suspension proceeding authorized pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 44932 or Section 44933.

(4) The decision of the administrative law judge shall be deemed to be the final decision of the governing board of the school district.

(5) The state board may adopt from time to time rules and procedures not inconsistent with this section as may be necessary to effectuate this section.

(6) The governing board of the school district and the employee shall have the right to be represented by counsel.

(f) (1) If the administrative law judge determines that the employee should be dismissed or suspended, the governing board of the school district and the state shall share equally the expenses of the hearing, including the cost of the administrative law judge. The Controller shall pay all claims submitted pursuant to this paragraph from the General Fund, and may prescribe reasonable rules, regulations, and forms for the submission of the claims. The employee and the governing board of the school district shall pay their own attorney’s fees.

(2) If the administrative law judge determines that the employee should not be dismissed or suspended, the governing board of the school district shall pay the expenses of the hearing, including
 the cost of the administrative law judge, and reasonable attorney’s fees incurred by the employee.

(3) If either the governing board of the school district or the employee petitions a court of competent jurisdiction for review of the decision of the administrative law judge, the payment of the expenses of the hearing, including the cost of the administrative law judge required by this subdivision, shall not be stayed.

(4) If either the governing board of the school district or the employee petitions a court of competent jurisdiction for review of the decision of the administrative law judge and the decision is upheld, the appellee shall be entitled to an award of reasonable attorney’s fees and costs expended on the appeal.

(5) If the decision of the administrative law judge is reversed or vacated by a court of
 competent jurisdiction, either the state, having paid one-half of the expenses of the hearing, including the cost of the administrative law judge, shall be entitled to reimbursement from the governing board of the school district for those expenses, or the governing board of the school district, having paid one-half of the expenses, shall be entitled to reimbursement from the state. If either the governing board of the school district or the employee petitions a court of competent jurisdiction for review of the decision to overturn the administrative law judge’s decision, the payment of the expenses of the hearing, including the cost of the administrative law judge required by this paragraph, shall be stayed until no further appeal is sought, or all appeals are exhausted.

(g) The hearing provided for in this section shall be conducted in a place selected in accordance with Section 11508 of the Government
 Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 55, Sec. 18.   (AB 215)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

44944.3.

At a hearing conducted pursuant to Section 44944 or 44944.1, the administrative law judge, before admitting any testimony or evidence concerning an individual pupil, shall determine whether the introduction of the testimony or evidence at an open hearing would violate any provision of Article 5 (commencing with Section 49073) of Chapter 6.5 of Part 27 of Division 4, relating to privacy of pupil records. If the administrative law judge, in his or her discretion, determines that any of those provisions would be violated, he or she shall order that the hearing, or any portion of the hearing at which the testimony or evidence would be produced, be conducted in executive session.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 91.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

44945.

The decision reached in a dismissal or suspension proceeding initiated pursuant to Section 44934 or 44934.1 may, on petition of either the governing board or the employee, be reviewed by a court of competent jurisdiction in the same manner as a decision made by a hearing officer under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The court, on review, shall exercise its independent judgment on the evidence. The proceeding shall be set for hearing at the earliest possible date and shall take precedence over all other cases, except older matters of the same character and matters to which special precedence is given by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 55, Sec. 20.   (AB 215)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

44946.

If the employee has been suspended pending the hearing, he shall be reinstated within five days after the governing board’s decision in his favor, and shall be paid full salary by the governing board for the period of his suspension.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44947.

If an employee is dismissed for immoral conduct or conviction of a felony or crime involving moral turpitude, the governing board shall transmit to the Commission on Teacher Credentialing and to the county board of education which issued the certificate under which the employee was serving at the time of his dismissal, a copy of the reporter’s transcript of the hearing accompanied by a request that any certificate issued by the county board of education to the employee be revoked if the employee is not reinstated upon appeal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1263, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

44948.

(a) Governing boards of school districts shall dismiss probationary employees during the school year for cause only, as in the case of permanent employees.

This subdivision shall apply only to probationary employees whose probationary period commenced prior to the 1983–84 fiscal year or who are employed in a school district having an average daily attendance of less than 250 pupils.

(b) The governing board may suspend a probationary employee for a specified period of time without pay as an alternative to dismissal pursuant to this section. This subdivision shall apply only to probationary employees whose probationary period commenced prior to the 1983–84 fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 498, Sec. 60.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

44948.2.

Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 44948 and subdivision (c) of Section 44948.3, the governing board of any school district having an average daily attendance of less than 250 may elect to dismiss probationary employees during the school year pursuant to the provisions of Section 44948.3. Once a district has made an election pursuant to this section, it shall only dismiss probationary certificated employees during the school year pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 256, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

44948.3.

(a) First and second year probationary employees may be dismissed during the school year for unsatisfactory performance determined pursuant to Article 11 (commencing with Section 44660) of Chapter 3, or for cause pursuant to Section 44932. Any dismissal pursuant to this section shall be in accordance with all of the following procedures:

(1) The superintendent of the school district or the superintendent’s designee shall give 30 days’ prior written notice of dismissal, not later than March 15 in the case of second year probationary employees. The notice shall include a statement of the reasons for the dismissal and notice of the opportunity to appeal. In the event of a dismissal for unsatisfactory performance, a copy of the evaluation conducted pursuant to Section 44664 shall accompany the written notice. 

(2) The employee shall have 15 days from receipt of the notice of dismissal to submit to the governing board a written request for a hearing. The governing board may establish procedures for the appointment of an administrative law judge to conduct the hearing and submit a recommended decision to the board. The failure of an employee to request a hearing within 15 days from receipt of a dismissal notice shall constitute a waiver of the right to a hearing.

(b) The governing board, pursuant to this section, may suspend a probationary employee for a specified period of time without pay as an alternative to dismissal.

(c) This section applies only to probationary employees whose probationary period commenced during the 1983–84 fiscal year or any fiscal year thereafter, and does not apply to probationary employees in a school district having an average daily attendance of less than 250 pupils.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 324, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

44948.5.

(a) This section applies only to (1) probationary employees of a school district with an average daily attendance of less than 250 pupils, or (2) those persons currently employed as probationary employees whose probationary period commenced prior to the 1983–84 fiscal year.

(b) No later than March 15 and before a probationary employee is given notice by the governing board that his or her services will not be required for the ensuing year for reasons other than those specified in Section 44955, the governing board and the employee shall be given written notice by the superintendent of the district or his or her designee, or, in the case of a district which has no superintendent, by the clerk or secretary of the governing board, that it has been recommended that the notice be given to the employee, and stating the reasons therefor.

If the probationary employee has been in the employ of the district for less than 45 days on March 15, the giving of the notice may be deferred until the 45th day of employment and all time period and deadline dates prescribed by this subdivision shall be coextensively extended.

Until the employee has requested a hearing as provided in subdivision (c) or has waived his or her right to a hearing, the notice and the reasons therefor shall be confidential and shall not be divulged by any person, except as may be necessary in the performance of duties. However, the violation of this requirement of confidentiality, in and of itself, shall not in any manner be construed as affecting the validity of any hearing conducted pursuant to this section.

(c) The employee may request a hearing to determine if there is cause for not reemploying him or her for the ensuing year. A request for a hearing shall be in writing and shall be delivered to the person who sent the notice pursuant to subdivision (b), on or before a date specified in that subdivision, which shall not be less than seven days after the date on which the notice is served upon the employee. If an employee fails to request a hearing on or before the date specified, his or her failure to do so shall constitute a waiver of his or her right to a hearing. The notice provided for in subdivision (b) shall advise the employee of the provisions of this subdivision.

(d) In the event a hearing is requested by the employee, the proceeding shall be conducted and a decision made in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code and the governing board shall have all the power granted to an agency therein, except that all of the following shall apply:

(1) The respondent shall file his or her notice of defense, if any, within five days after service upon him or her of the accusation and he or she shall be notified of this five-day period for filing in the accusation.

(2) The discovery authorized by Section 11507.6 of the Government Code shall be available only if request is made therefor within 15 days after service of the accusation, and the notice required by Section 11505 of the Government Code shall so indicate.

(3) The hearing shall be conducted by an administrative law judge who shall prepare a proposed decision, containing findings of fact and a determination as to whether the charges sustained by the evidence are related to the welfare of the schools and the pupils thereof. The proposed decision shall be prepared for the governing board and shall contain a determination as to the sufficiency of the cause and a recommendation as to disposition. However, the governing board shall make the final determination as to the sufficiency of the cause and disposition. None of the findings, recommendations, or determinations contained in the proposed decision prepared by the administrative law judge shall be binding on the governing board. Nonsubstantive procedural errors committed by the school district or governing board of the school district shall not constitute cause for dismissing the charges unless the errors are prejudicial errors. Copies of the proposed decision shall be submitted to the governing board and to the employee on or before May 7 of the year in which the proceeding is commenced. All expenses of the hearing, including the cost of the administrative law judge, shall be paid by the governing board from the district funds.

The board may adopt from time to time such rules and procedures not inconsistent with provisions of this section as may be necessary to effectuate this section.

(e) The governing board’s determination not to reemploy a probationary employee for the ensuing school year shall be for cause only. The determination of the governing board as to the sufficiency of the cause pursuant to this section shall be conclusive, but the cause shall relate solely to the welfare of the schools and the pupils thereof. The decision made after the hearing shall be effective on May 15 of the year the proceeding is commenced.

(f) Notice to the probationary employee by the governing board that his or her service will not be required for the ensuing year, shall be given no later than May 15.

(g) If a governing board notifies a probationary employee that his or her services will not be required for the ensuing year, the board shall, within 10 days after delivery to it of the employee’s written request, provide the employee with a statement of its reasons for not reemploying him or her for the ensuing school year.

(h) Any notice or request shall be deemed sufficient when it is delivered in person to the employee to whom it is directed, or when it is deposited in the United States registered mail, postage prepaid and addressed to the last known address of the employee.

(i) In the event that the governing board does not give notice provided for in subdivision (e) on or before May 15, the employee shall be deemed reemployed for the ensuing school year.

(j) If after request for hearing pursuant to subdivision (c) any continuance is granted pursuant to Section 11524 of the Government Code, the dates prescribed in subdivisions (d), (e), (f), and (i) which occur on or after the date of granting the continuance shall be extended for a period of time equal to the continuance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 324, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

44949.

(a) (1) No later than March 15 and before an employee is given notice by the governing board that his or her services will not be required for the ensuing year for the reasons specified in Section 44955, the governing board and the employee shall be given written notice by the superintendent of the district or his or her designee, or in the case of a school district that has no superintendent by the clerk or secretary of the governing board, that it has been recommended that the notice be given to the employee, and stating the reasons therefor.

(2) Until the employee has requested a hearing as provided in subdivision (b) or has waived his or her right to a
 hearing, the notice and the reasons therefor shall be confidential and shall not be divulged by any person, except as may be necessary in the performance of duties. However, the violation of this requirement of confidentiality, in and of itself, shall not in any manner be construed as affecting the validity of any hearing conducted pursuant to this section.

(b) The employee may request a hearing to determine if there is cause for not reemploying him or her for the ensuing year. A request for a hearing shall be in writing and shall be delivered to the person who sent the notice pursuant to subdivision (a), on or before a date specified in that subdivision, which shall not be less than seven days after the date on which the notice is served upon the employee. If an employee fails to request a hearing on or before the date specified, his or her failure to do so shall constitute his or her waiver of his or her right to a hearing. The notice
 provided for in subdivision (a) shall advise the employee of the provisions of this subdivision.

(c) If a hearing is requested by the employee, the proceeding shall be conducted and a decision made in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code and the governing board shall have all the power granted to an agency in that chapter, except that all of the following shall apply:

(1) The respondent shall file his or her notice of participation, if any, within five days after service upon him or her of the District Statement of Reduction in Force and he or she shall be notified of this five-day period for filing in the District Statement of Reduction in Force.

(2) The discovery authorized by Section 11507.6 of the Government Code shall be available
 only if request is made therefor within 15 days after service of the District Statement of Reduction in Force, and the notice required by Section 11505 of the Government Code shall so indicate.

(3) The hearing shall be conducted by an administrative law judge who shall prepare a proposed decision, containing findings of fact and a determination as to whether the charges sustained by the evidence are related to the welfare of the schools and the pupils of the schools. The proposed decision shall be prepared for the governing board and shall contain a determination as to the sufficiency of the cause and a recommendation as to disposition. However, the governing board shall make the final determination as to the sufficiency of the cause and disposition. None of the findings, recommendations, or determinations contained in the proposed decision prepared by the administrative law judge shall be binding on the governing board. Nonsubstantive
 procedural errors committed by the school district or governing board of the school district shall not constitute cause for dismissing the charges unless the errors are prejudicial errors. Copies of the proposed decision shall be submitted to the governing board and to the employee on or before May 7 of the year in which the proceeding is commenced. All expenses of the hearing, including the cost of the administrative law judge, shall be paid by the governing board from the district funds.

(d) Any notice or request shall be deemed sufficient when it is delivered in person to the employee to whom it is directed, or when it is deposited in the United States registered mail, postage prepaid and addressed to the last known address of the employee.

(e) If after a request for hearing pursuant to subdivision (b) a continuance is granted pursuant to Section 11524 of the Government Code,
 the dates prescribed in subdivision (c) that occur on or after the date of granting the continuance and the date prescribed in subdivision (c) of Section 44955 that occurs after the date of granting the continuance shall be extended for a period of time equal to the continuance.

(f) The governing board may adopt from time to time rules and procedures not inconsistent with this section as may be necessary to effectuate this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 90, Sec. 1.   (SB 546)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

44951.

Unless a certificated employee holding a position requiring an administrative or supervisory credential is sent written notice deposited in the United States registered mail with postage prepaid and addressed to his or her last known address by March 15 that he or she may be released from his or her position for the following school year, or unless the signature of the employee is obtained by March 15 on the written notice that he or she may be released from his or her position for the following year, he or she shall be continued in the position. The provisions of this section do not apply to a certificated employee who holds a written contract with an expiration date beyond the current school year, or to a certificated employee holding a position that is funded for less than a school year, or to a certificated employee assigned to an acting position whose continuing right to hold this position depends on being selected from an eligible list established for the position, or to the termination of employment pursuant to Section 44955.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 261, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

44952.

The provisions of Section 44949 shall not be construed as in any way modifying or affecting the provisions of Section 44948.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44953.

Governing boards of school districts may dismiss substitute employees at any time at the pleasure of the board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44954.

Governing boards of school districts may release temporary employees requiring certification qualifications under the following circumstances:

(a) At the pleasure of the board prior to serving during one school year at least 75 percent of the number of days the regular schools of the district are maintained.

(b) After serving during one school year the number of days set forth in subdivision (a), if the employee is notified before the end of the school year of the district’s decision not to reelect the employee for the next succeeding year.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 336, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

44955.

(a) No permanent employee shall be deprived of his or her position for causes other than those specified in Sections 44907 and 44923, and Sections 44932 to 44947, inclusive, and no probationary employee shall be deprived of his or her position for cause other than as specified in Sections 44948 to 44949, inclusive.

(b) Whenever in any school year the average daily attendance in all of the schools of a district for the first six months in which school is in session shall have declined below the corresponding period of either of the previous two school years, whenever the governing board determines that attendance in a district will decline in the following year as a result of the termination of an interdistrict tuition agreement as defined in Section 46304, whenever a particular kind of service is to be reduced or discontinued not later than the beginning of the following school year, or whenever the amendment of state law requires the modification of curriculum, and when in the opinion of the governing board of the district it shall have become necessary by reason of any of these conditions to decrease the number of permanent employees in the district, the governing board may terminate the services of not more than a corresponding percentage of the certificated employees of the district, permanent as well as probationary, at the close of the school year. Except as otherwise provided by statute, the services of no permanent employee may be terminated under the provisions of this section while any probationary employee, or any other employee with less seniority, is retained to render a service which said permanent employee is certificated and competent to render.

In computing a decline in average daily attendance for purposes of this section for a newly formed or reorganized school district, each school of the district shall be deemed to have been a school of the newly formed or reorganized district for both of the two previous school years.

As between employees who first rendered paid service to the district on the same date, the governing board shall determine the order of termination solely on the basis of needs of the district and the students thereof. Upon the request of any employee whose order of termination is so determined, the governing board shall furnish in writing no later than five days prior to the commencement of the hearing held in accordance with Section 44949, a statement of the specific criteria used in determining the order of termination and the application of the criteria in ranking each employee relative to the other employees in the group. This requirement that the governing board provide, on request, a written statement of reasons for determining the order of termination shall not be interpreted to give affected employees any legal right or interest that would not exist without such a requirement.

(c) Notice of such termination of services shall be given before the 15th of May in the manner prescribed in Section 44949, and services of such employees shall be terminated in the inverse of the order in which they were employed, as determined by the board in accordance with the provisions of Sections 44844 and 44845. In the event that a permanent or probationary employee is not given the notices and a right to a hearing as provided for in Section 44949, he or she shall be deemed reemployed for the ensuing school year.

The governing board shall make assignments and reassignments in such a manner that employees shall be retained to render any service which their seniority and qualifications entitle them to render. However, prior to assigning or reassigning any certificated employee to teach a subject which he or she has not previously taught, and for which he or she does not have a teaching credential or which is not within the employee’s major area of postsecondary study or the equivalent thereof, the governing board shall require the employee to pass a subject matter competency test in the appropriate subject.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), a school district may deviate from terminating a certificated employee in order of seniority for either of the following reasons:

(1) The district demonstrates a specific need for personnel to teach a specific course or course of study, or to provide services authorized by a services credential with a specialization in either pupil personnel services or health for a school nurse, and that the certificated employee has special training and experience necessary to teach that course or course of study or to provide those services, which others with more seniority do not possess.

(2) For purposes of maintaining or achieving compliance with constitutional requirements related to equal protection of the laws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1302, Sec. 15.2.   Effective September 30, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

44955.5.

(a) During the time period between five days after the enactment of an annual Budget Act and August 15 of the fiscal year to which that Budget Act applies, if the governing board of a school district determines that its total local control funding formula apportionment per unit of average daily attendance for the fiscal year of that Budget Act has not increased by at least 2 percent, and if the governing board of a school district determines it is therefore necessary to decrease the number of permanent employees in the school district, the governing board of the school district may terminate the services of any permanent or probationary certificated employees of the school district, including employees holding a position that requires an administrative or supervisory credential. The termination shall be pursuant to Sections
 44951 and 44955 but, notwithstanding anything to the contrary in Sections 44951 and 44955, in accordance with a schedule of notice and hearing adopted by the governing board of the school district.

(b) This section is inoperative from July 1, 2002, to July 1, 2003, inclusive, and from July 1, 2011, to July 1, 2012, inclusive.

(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), this section is inoperative from July 1, 2020, to July 1, 2021, inclusive.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), from July 1, 2020, to July 1, 2021, inclusive, a certificated employee of a school district holding a position that requires an administrative or supervisory credential may be terminated pursuant to subdivision (a).

(d) This section is inoperative from July
 1, 2024, to July 1, 2025, inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 40.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.   Amendment makes this section inoperative from July 1, 2024, to July 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

44956.

Any permanent employee whose services have been terminated as provided in Section 44955 shall have the following rights:

(a) For the period of 39 months from the date of the termination, any employee who in the meantime has not attained the age of 65 years shall have the preferred right to reappointment, in the order of original employment as determined by the board in accordance with Sections 44831 to 44855, inclusive, if the number of employees is increased or the discontinued service is reestablished, with no requirements that were not imposed upon other employees who continued in service; provided, that no probationary or other employee with less seniority shall be employed to render a service that
 the employee is certificated and competent to render. However, prior to reappointing any employee to teach a subject that he or she has not previously taught, and for which he or she does not have a teaching credential or that is not within the employee’s major area of postsecondary study or the equivalent thereof, the governing board shall require the employee to pass a subject matter competency test in the appropriate subject.

(b) The right to reappointment described in subdivision (a) may be waived by the employee, without prejudice, for not more than one school year, unless the board extends this right, but the waiver shall not deprive the employee of his or her right to subsequent offers of reappointment.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a school district may deviate from reappointing a certificated employee in order of seniority for either of the following reasons:

(1) The district demonstrates a specific need for personnel to teach a specific course or course of study, or to provide services authorized by a services credential with a specialization in either pupil personnel services or health for a school nurse, and that the employee has special training and experience necessary to teach that course or course of study, or to provide those services, that others with more seniority do not possess.

(2) For purposes of maintaining or achieving compliance with constitutional requirements related to equal protection of the laws.

(d) As to any employee who is reappointed, the period of his or her absence shall be treated as a leave of absence and shall not be considered as a break in the continuity of his or her service, he or she shall retain the classification and order of employment
 he or she had when his or her services were terminated, and credit for prior service under any state or district retirement system shall not be affected by such termination, but the period of his or her absence shall not count as a part of the service required for retirement.

(e) During the period of his or her preferred right to reappointment, an employee shall, in the order of original employment, be offered prior opportunity for substitute service during the absence of any other employee who has been granted a leave of absence or who is temporarily absent from duty; provided, that his or her services may be terminated upon the return to duty of the other employee and that substitute service shall not affect the retention of his or her previous classification and rights. If, in any school year the employee serves as a substitute in any position requiring certification for 21 days or more within a period of 60 schooldays, the compensation the
 employee receives for substitute service in that 60-day period, including his or her first 20 days of substitute service, shall be not less than the amount the employee would receive if he or she were being reappointed.

(f) (1) During the period of the employee’s preferred right to reappointment, the governing board of the district, if it is also the governing board of one or more other districts, may assign him or her to service, which he or she is certificated and competent to render, in another district or districts; provided, that the compensation he or she receives therefor may, in the discretion of the governing board, be the same as he or she would have received had he or she been serving in the district from which his or her services were terminated, that his or her service in the other district or districts shall be counted toward the period required for both state and local retirement as though rendered in the
 district from which his or her services were terminated, and that no permanent employee in the other district or districts shall be displaced by him or her.

(2) It is the intent of this subdivision that the employees of a school district, the governing board of which is also the governing board of one or more other school districts, shall not be at a disadvantage as compared with employees of a unified school district.

(g) At any time prior to the completion of one year after his or her return to service, he or she may continue or make up, with interest, his or her own contributions to any state or district retirement system, for the period of his or her absence, but it shall not be obligatory on state or district to match those contributions.

(h) Should he or she become disabled or reach retirement age at any time
 before his or her return to service, he or she shall receive, in any state or district retirement system of which he or she was a member, all benefits to which he or she would have been entitled had such event occurred at the time of his or her termination of service, plus any benefits he or she may have qualified for thereafter, as though still employed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 38.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

44956.5.

For a certificated employee initially employed in an administrative position on or after July 1, 1983, who transfers to a teaching position, the period of employment in the administrative position shall not be included in determining seniority for purposes of Sections 44955 and 44956, except for school site administrators who shall earn up to a maximum of three years seniority while serving as site administrators.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 498, Sec. 67.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

44957.

Any probationary employee whose services have been terminated as provided in Section 44955 shall have the following rights:

(a) For the period of 24 months from the date of such termination, any employee who in the meantime has not attained the age of 65 years shall have the preferred right to reappointment, subject to the prior rights to reappointment by all permanent employees as set forth in Section 44956, in the order of original employment as determined by the governing board in accordance with the provisions of Sections 44831 to 44855, inclusive, if the number of employees is increased or the discontinued service is reestablished, with no requirements that were not imposed upon other employees who continued in service. Except as otherwise provided, no probationary or temporary employee with less seniority shall be employed to render a service which such employee is certificated and competent to render and provided that such an employee shall be given a priority over employees whose right to a position is derived pursuant to Section 44918. However, prior to reappointing any employee to teach a subject which he or she has not previously taught, and for which he or she does not have a teaching credential or which is not within the employee’s major area of postsecondary study or the equivalent thereof, the governing board shall require the employee to pass a subject matter competency test in the appropriate subject.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a school district may deviate from reappointing a probationary employee in order of seniority for either of the following reasons:

(1) The district demonstrates a specific need for personnel to teach a specific course or course of study, or to provide services authorized by a services credential with a specialization in either pupil personnel services or health for a school nurse, and that the employee has special training and experience necessary to teach that course or course of study, or to provide those services, which others with more seniority do not possess.

(2) For purposes of maintaining or achieving compliance with constitutional requirements related to equal protection of the laws.
